Hawaii statutes.
[§39A‑238] Special purpose
revenue bonds as legal investments and lawful security. The special
purpose revenue bonds issued pursuant to this part shall be and are declared to
be legal and authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies,
savings and loan associations, insurance companies, credit unions, fiduciaries,
trustees, guardians, and for all public funds of the State or other political
corporations or subdivisions of the State. Such special purpose revenue bonds
shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of the
State and any and all public funds of counties or other political corporations
or subdivisions of the State, and such bonds shall be lawful and sufficient
security for such deposits to the extent of their value when accompanied by all
unmatured coupons appertaining thereto. [L 1994, c 280, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next